Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-404
Adult day service, defined.

(1) Adult day service means a person or any legal entity which provides care and an array of social, medical, or other support services for a period of less than twenty-four consecutive hours in a community-based group program to four or more persons who require or request such services due to age or functional impairment.

(2) Adult day service does not include community-based waiver services provided by an entity certified as a specialized program pursuant to the Developmental Disabilities Services Act or a PACE center.

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 4;

Laws 2002, LB 1062, § 39;

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB1057, § 1.
April 15, 2026
Developmental Disabilities Services Act, see section 83-1201.